Florida, session 2026, SB262.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âSection 499.0121, Florida Statutes, is amended 15 to read: 16 499.0121âStorage and handling of prescription drugs; 17 recordkeeping.âThe department shall adopt rules to implement 18 this section as necessary to protect the public health, safety, 19 and welfare. Such rules shall include, but not be limited to, 20 requirements for the storage and handling of prescription drugs 21 and for the establishment and maintenance of prescription drug 22 distribution records. 23 (1)âESTABLISHMENTS.âAn establishment at which prescription 24 drugs are stored, warehoused, handled, held, offered, marketed, 25 or displayed must: 26 (a)âBe of suitable size and construction to facilitate 27 cleaning, maintenance, and proper operations; 28 (b)âHave storage areas designed to provide adequate 29 lighting, ventilation, temperature, sanitation, humidity, space, 30 equipment, and security conditions; 31 (c)âHave a quarantine area for storage of prescription 32 drugs that are outdated, damaged, deteriorated, misbranded, or 33 adulterated, or that are in immediate or sealed, secondary 34 containers that have been opened; 35 (d)âBe maintained in a clean and orderly condition; and 36 (e)âBe free from infestation by insects, rodents, birds, or 37 vermin of any kind. 38 (2)âSECURITY.â 39 (a)âAn establishment that is used for wholesale drug 40 distribution must be secure from unauthorized entry. 41 1.âAccess from outside the premises must be kept to a 42 minimum and be well controlled. 43 2.âThe outside perimeter of the premises must be well 44 lighted. 45 3.âEntry into areas where prescription drugs are held must 46 be limited to authorized personnel. 47 (b)âAn establishment that is used for wholesale drug 48 distribution must be equipped with: 49 1.âAn alarm system to detect entry after hours; however, 50 the department may exempt by rule establishments that only hold 51 a permit as prescription drug wholesale distributor-brokers; and 52 2.âA security system that will provide suitable protection 53 against theft and diversion. When appropriate, the security 54 system must provide protection against theft or diversion that 55 is facilitated or hidden by tampering with computers or 56 electronic records. 57 (c)âAny vehicle that contains prescription drugs must be 58 secure from unauthorized access to the prescription drugs in the 59 vehicle. 60 (3)âSTORAGE.âAll prescription drugs shall be stored at 61 appropriate temperatures and under appropriate conditions in 62 accordance with requirements, if any, in the labeling of such 63 drugs, or with requirements in the official compendium. 64 (a)âIf no storage requirements are established for a 65 prescription drug, the drug may be held at âcontrolledâ room 66 temperature, as defined in the official compendium, to help 67 ensure that its identity, strength, quality, and purity are not 68 adversely affected. 69 (b)âAppropriate manual, electromechanical, or electronic 70 temperature and humidity recording equipment, devices, or logs 71 must be used to document proper storage of prescription drugs. 72 (c)âThe recordkeeping requirements in subsection (6) must 73 be followed for all stored prescription drugs. 74 (4)âEXAMINATION OF MATERIALS AND RECORDS.â 75 (a)âUpon receipt, each outside shipping container must be 76 visually examined for identity and to prevent the acceptance of 77 contaminated prescription drugs that are otherwise unfit for 78 distribution. This examination must be adequate to reveal 79 container damage that would suggest possible contamination or 80 other damage to the contents. 81 (b)âEach outgoing shipment must be carefully inspected for 82 identity of the prescription drug products and to ensure that 83 there is no delivery of prescription drugs that have expired or 84 been damaged in storage or held under improper conditions. 85 (c)âThe recordkeeping requirements in subsection (6) must 86 be followed for all incoming and outgoing prescription drugs. 87 (d)âUpon receipt, a wholesale distributor must review 88 records required under this section for the acquisition of 89 prescription drugs for accuracy and completeness, considering 90 the total facts and circumstances surrounding the transactions 91 and the wholesale distributors involved. 92 (5)âRETURNED, DAMAGED, OR OUTDATED PRESCRIPTION DRUGS.â 93 (a)1.âPrescription drugs that are outdated, damaged, 94 deteriorated, misbranded, or adulterated must be quarantined and 95 physically separated from other prescription drugs until they 96 are destroyed or returned to their supplier. A quarantine 97 section must be separate and apart from other sections where 98 prescription drugs are stored so that prescription drugs in this 99 section are not confused with usable prescription drugs. 100 2.âPrescription drugs must be examined at least every 12 101 months, and drugs for which the expiration date has passed must 102 be removed and quarantined. 103 (b)âAny prescription drugs of which the immediate or sealed 104 outer containers or sealed secondary containers have been opened 105 or used must be identified as such and must be quarantined and 106 physically separated from other prescription drugs until they 107 are destroyed or returned to the supplier. 108 (c)âIf the conditions under which a prescription drug has 109 been returned cast doubt on the drugâs safety, identity, 110 strength, quality, or purity, the drug must be destroyed or 111 returned to the supplier, unless examination, testing, or other 112 investigation proves that the drug meets appropriate standards 113 of safety, identity, strength, quality, and purity. In 114 determining whether the conditions under which a drug has been 115 returned cast doubt on the drugâs safety, identity, strength, 116 quality, or purity, the wholesale distributor must consider, 117 among other things, the conditions under which the drug has been 118 held, stored, or shipped before or during its return and the 119 conditions of the drug and its container, carton, or labeling, 120 as a result of storage or shipping. 121 (d)âThe recordkeeping requirements in subsection (6) must 122 be followed for all outdated, damaged, deteriorated, misbranded, 123 or adulterated prescription drugs. 124 (6)âRECORDKEEPING.âThe department shall adopt rules that 125 require keeping such records of prescription drugs, including 126 active pharmaceutical ingredients, as are necessary for the 127 protection of the public health. 128 (a)âThe following persons must maintain business records 129 that include the information specified in paragraph (b): 130 1.âPersons permitted or required to be permitted under this 131 chapter to engage in the manufacture, repackaging, or 132 distribution of active pharmaceutical ingredients or 133 prescription drugs. 134 2.âPersons other than those set forth in subparagraph 1. 135 that engage in the receipt of active pharmaceutical ingredients 136 or prescription drugs. 137 (b)âBusiness records for persons specified in paragraph (a) 138 must include: 139 1.âThe name and address of the seller, and the Florida 140 permit number of the seller if such seller is not exempt from 141 Florida permitting requirements, of the active pharmaceutical 142 ingredient or prescription drug. 143 2.âThe address of the location the active pharmaceutical 144 ingredient or prescription drug was shipped from. 145 3.âThe distribution date of the active pharmaceutical 146 ingredient or prescription drug. 147 4.âThe name, strength, and quantity, and the National Drug 148 Code if such code has been assigned, of the distributed active 149 pharmaceutical ingredient or prescription drug. 150 5.âThe name and Florida permit number of the person that 151 purchased the active pharmaceutical ingredient or prescription 152 drug. 153 6.âThe financial data, including the unit type and unit 154 price, for the distributions involving active pharmaceutical 155 ingredients or prescription drugs. 156 7.âThe date and method of disposition of the active 157 pharmaceutical ingredient or prescription drug. 158 (c)âEach manufacturer or repackager of medical devices, 159 over-the-counter drugs, or cosmetics must maintain business 160 records that include: 161 1.âThe name and address of the seller or transferor of the 162 product. 163 2.âThe address of the location the product was shipped 164 from. 165 3.âThe date of the sale or distribution of the product. 166 4.âThe name and quantity of the product involved. 167 5.âThe name and address of the person who purchased the 168 product. 169 (d)âPersons permitted, or required to be permitted, under 170 this chapter to engage in the manufacture, repackaging, or 171 distribution of active pharmaceutical ingredients or 172 prescription drugs; or the manufacture or repackaging of medical 173 devices, over-the-counter drugs, and cosmetics; must establish, 174 maintain, or have the capability to create a current inventory 175 of the active pharmaceutical ingredients, prescription drugs, 176 over-the-counter drugs, cosmetics, and devices at an 177 establishment where activities specified in this paragraph are 178 undertaken and must be able to produce such inventory for 179 inspection by the department within 2 business days. 180 (e)âBusiness records required to be kept pursuant to this 181 section, and that are kept at the inspection site or can be 182 immediately retrieved by computer or other electronic means, 183 must be readily available for authorized inspection during the 184 retention period. Records kept at a central location outside of 185 this state which are not electronically retrievable must be made 186 available for inspection within 2 working days after a request 187 by an authorized official of a federal, state, or local law 188 enforcement agency. Records maintained at a central location 189 within this state must be maintained at an establishment that is 190 permitted pursuant to this part, and such records must be 191 readily available for inspection. 192 (f)âRecords required to be kept pursuant to this subsection 193 must be maintained as specified for a period of not less than 6 194 years from the date of disposition of the active pharmaceutical 195 ingredients, prescription drugs, over-the-counter drugs, medical 196 devices, or cosmetics. 197 (g)âTo the extent that prescription drugs are also products 198 as defined in the federal act, as amended, and the information 199 required by the business records requirements of this section 200 are also included in the tracking and tracing requirements of 201 the federal act, as amended, and departmental rules, the 202 manufacturer, wholesale distributor, repackager, or dispenser 203 must follow both the requirements of the federal act, as 204 amended, and departmental rules. 205 (7)âPRESCRIPTION DRUG PURCHASE LIST.âEach wholesale 206 distributor, except for a manufacturer, shall annually provide 207 the department with a written list of all wholesale distributors 208 and manufacturers from whom the wholesale distributor purchases 209 prescription drugs. A wholesale distributor, except a 210 manufacturer, shall notify the department not later than 10 days 211 after any change to either list. 212 (8)âWRITTEN POLICIES AND PROCEDURES.âWholesale distributors 213 must establish, maintain, and adhere to written policies and 214 procedures, which must be followed for the receipt, security, 215 storage, inventory, and distribution of prescription drugs, 216 including policies and procedures for identifying, recording, 217 and reporting losses or thefts, and for correcting all errors 218 and inaccuracies in inventories. Wholesale distributors must 219 include in their written policies and procedures: 220 (a)âA procedure whereby the oldest approved stock of a 221 prescription drug product is distributed first. The procedure 222 may permit deviation from this requirement, if the deviation is 223 temporary and appropriate. 224 (b)âA procedure to be followed for handling recalls and 225 withdrawals of prescription drugs. Such procedure must be 226 adequate to deal with recalls and withdrawals due to: 227 1.âAny action initiated at the request of the Food and Drug 228 Administration or any other federal, state, or local law 229 enforcement or other government agency, including the 230 department. 231 2.âAny voluntary action by the manufacturer or repackager 232 to remove defective or potentially defective drugs from the 233 market; or 234 3.âAny action undertaken to promote public health and 235 safety by replacing existing merchandise with an improved 236 product or new package design. 237 (c)âA procedure to ensure that wholesale distributors 238 prepare for, protect against, and handle any crisis that affects 239 security or operation of any facility if a strike, fire, flood, 240 or other natural disaster, or a local, state, or national 241 emergency, occurs. 242 (d)âA procedure to ensure that any outdated prescription 243 drugs are segregated from other drugs and returned to the 244 manufacturer or repackager or destroyed. This procedure must 245 provide for written documentation of the disposition of outdated 246 prescription drugs. This documentation must be maintained for 2 247 years after disposition of the outdated drugs. 248 (9)âRESPONSIBLE PERSONS.âWholesale distributors must 249 establish and maintain lists of officers, directors, managers, 250 designated representatives, and other persons in charge of 251 wholesale drug distribution, storage, and handling, including a 252 description of their duties and a summary of their 253 qualifications. 254 (10)âCOMPLIANCE WITH FEDERAL, STATE, AND LOCAL LAW.âA 255 wholesale distributor must operate in compliance with applicable 256 federal, state, and local laws and regulations. 257 (a)âA wholesale distributor must allow the department and 258 authorized federal, state, and local officials to enter and 259 inspect its premises and delivery vehicles, and to audit its 260 records and written operating procedures, at reasonable times 261 and in a reasonable manner, to the extent authorized by law. 262 (b)âA wholesale distributor that deals in controlled 263 substances must register with the Drug Enforcement 264 Administration and must comply with all applicable state, local, 265 and federal laws. A wholesale distributor that distributes any 266 substance controlled under chapter 893 must notify the 267 department when registering with the Drug Enforcement 268 Administration pursuant to that chapter and must provide the 269 department with its DEA number. 270 (11)âSALVAGING AND REPROCESSING.âA wholesale distributor is 271 subject to any applicable federal, state, or local laws or 272 regulations that relate to prescription drug product salvaging 273 or reprocessing. 274 (12)âSHIPPING AND TRANSPORTATION.âThe person responsible 275 for shipment and transportation of a prescription drug in a 276 wholesale distribution may use a common carrier; its own vehicle 277 or employee acting within the scope of employment if authorized 278 under s. 499.03 for the possession of prescription drugs in this 279 state; or, in the case of a prescription drug intended for 280 domestic distribution, an independent contractor who must be the 281 agent of the authorized seller or recipient responsible for 282 shipping and transportation as set forth in a written contract 283 between the parties. A person selling a prescription drug for 284 export must obtain documentation, such as a validated airway 285 bill, bill of lading, or other appropriate documentation that 286 the prescription drug was exported. A person responsible for 287 shipping or transporting prescription drugs is not required to 288 maintain documentation from a common carrier that the designated 289 recipient received the prescription drugs; however, the person 290 must obtain such documentation from the common carrier and make 291 it available to the department upon request of the department. 292 (13)âDUE DILIGENCE OF SUPPLIERS.âPrior to purchasing any 293 prescription drugs from another wholesale distributor, a 294 prescription drug wholesale distributor, an out-of-state 295 prescription drug wholesale distributor, or a prescription drug 296 repackager must: 297 (a)âEnter an agreement with the selling wholesale 298 distributor by which the selling wholesale distributor will 299 indemnify the purchasing wholesale distributor for any loss 300 caused to the purchasing wholesale distributor related to the 301 purchase of drugs from the selling wholesale distributor which 302 are determined to be counterfeit or to have been distributed in 303 violation of any federal or state law governing the distribution 304 of drugs. 305 (b)âDetermine that the selling wholesale distributor has 306 insurance coverage of not less than the greater of 1 percent of 307 the amount of total dollar volume of the prescription drug sales 308 reported to the department under s. 499.012(8)(g) or $500,000; 309 however the coverage need not exceed $2 million. 310 (c)âObtain information from the selling wholesale 311 distributor, including the length of time the selling wholesale 312 distributor has been licensed in this state, a copy of the 313 selling wholesale distributorâs licenses or permits, and 314 background information concerning the ownership of the selling 315 wholesale distributor, including the experience of the wholesale 316 distributor in the wholesale distribution of prescription drugs. 317 (d)âVerify that the selling wholesale distributorâs Florida 318 permit is valid. 319 (e)âInspect the selling wholesale distributorâs licensed 320 establishment to document that it has a policies and procedures 321 manual relating to the distribution of drugs, the appropriate 322 temperature controlled environment for drugs requiring 323 temperature control, an alarm system, appropriate access 324 restrictions, and procedures to ensure that records related to 325 the wholesale distribution of prescription drugs are maintained 326 as required by law: 327 1.âBefore purchasing any drug from the wholesale 328 distributor, and at least once each subsequent year; or 329 2.âBefore purchasing any drug from the wholesale 330 distributor, and each subsequent year obtain a complete copy of 331 the most recent inspection report for the establishment which 332 was prepared by the department or the regulatory authority 333 responsible for wholesale distributors in the state in which the 334 establishment is located. 335 (14)âDISTRIBUTION REPORTING.âEach prescription drug 336 wholesale distributor, out-of-state prescription drug wholesale 337 distributor, retail pharmacy drug wholesale distributor, 338 manufacturer, or repackager that engages in the wholesale 339 distribution of controlled substances as defined in s. 893.02 340 shall submit a report to the department of its receipts and 341 distributions of controlled substances listed in Schedule II, 342 Schedule III, Schedule IV, or Schedule V as provided in s. 343 893.03. Wholesale distributor facilities located within this 344 state shall report all transactions involving controlled 345 substances, and wholesale distributor facilities located outside 346 this state shall report all distributions to entities located in 347 this state. If the prescription drug wholesale distributor, out 348 of-state prescription drug wholesale distributor, retail 349 pharmacy drug wholesale distributor, manufacturer, or repackager 350 does not have any controlled substance distributions for the 351 month, a report shall be sent indicating that no distributions 352 occurred in the period. The report shall be submitted monthly by 353 the 20th of the next month, in the electronic format used for 354 controlled substance reporting to the Automation of Reports and 355 Consolidated Orders System division of the federal Drug 356 Enforcement Administration. Submission of electronic data must 357 be made in a secured Internet environment that allows for manual 358 or automated transmission. Upon successful transmission, an 359 acknowledgment page must be displayed to confirm receipt. The 360 report must contain the following information: 361 (a)âThe federal Drug Enforcement Administration 362 registration number of the wholesale distributing location. 363 (b)âThe federal Drug Enforcement Administration 364 registration number of the entity to which the drugs are 365 distributed or from which the drugs are received. 366 (c)âThe transaction code that indicates the type of 367 transaction. 368 (d)âThe National Drug Code identifier of the product and 369 the quantity distributed or received. 370 (e)âThe Drug Enforcement Administration Form 222 number or 371 Controlled Substance Ordering System Identifier on all Schedule 372 II transactions. 373 (f)âThe date of the transaction. 374 375 The department must share the reported data with the Department 376 of Law Enforcement and local law enforcement agencies upon 377 request and must monitor purchasing to identify purchasing 378 levels that are inconsistent with the purchasing entityâs 379 clinical needs. The Department of Law Enforcement shall 380 investigate purchases at levels that are inconsistent with the 381 purchasing entityâs clinical needs to determine whether 382 violations of chapter 893 have occurred. 383 (15)âDUE DILIGENCE OF PURCHASERS.â 384 (a)âEach prescription drug wholesale distributor, out-of 385 state prescription drug wholesale distributor, and retail 386 pharmacy drug wholesale distributor must establish and maintain 387 policies and procedures to credential physicians licensed under 388 chapter 458, chapter 459, chapter 461, or chapter 466 and 389 pharmacies that purchase or otherwise receive from the wholesale 390 distributor controlled substances listed in Schedule II or 391 Schedule III as provided in s. 893.03. The prescription drug 392 wholesale distributor, out-of-state prescription drug wholesale 393 distributor, or retail pharmacy drug wholesale distributor shall 394 maintain records of such credentialing and make the records 395 available to the department upon request. Such credentialing 396 must, at a minimum, include: 397 1.âA determination of the clinical nature of the receiving 398 entity, including any specialty practice area. 399 2.âA review of the receiving entityâs history of Schedule 400 II and Schedule III controlled substance purchasing from the 401 wholesale distributor. 402 3.âA determination that the receiving entityâs Schedule II 403 and Schedule III controlled substance purchasing history, if 404 any, is consistent with and reasonable for that entityâs 405 clinical business needs. 406 (b)âA wholesale distributor must take reasonable measures 407 to identify its customers, understand the normal and expected 408 transactions conducted by those customers, and identify those 409 transactions that are suspicious in nature. A wholesale 410 distributor must establish internal policies and procedures for 411 identifying suspicious orders and preventing suspicious 412 transactions. A wholesale distributor must assess orders for 413 more than 7,500 unit doses of any one controlled substance in 414 any one month to determine whether the purchase is reasonable. 415 In making such assessments, a wholesale distributor may consider 416 the purchasing entityâs clinical business needs, location, and 417 population served, in addition to other factors established in 418 the distributorâs policies and procedures. A wholesale 419 distributor must report to the department any regulated 420 transaction involving an extraordinary quantity of a listed 421 chemical, an uncommon method of payment or delivery, or any 422 other circumstance that the regulated person believes may 423 indicate that the listed chemical will be used in violation of 424 the law. The wholesale distributor shall maintain records that 425 document the report submitted to the department in compliance 426 with this paragraph. 427 (c)âA wholesale distributor may not distribute controlled 428 substances to an entity if any criminal history record check for 429 any person associated with that entity shows that the person has 430 been convicted of, or entered a plea of guilty or nolo 431 contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a crime in any 432 jurisdiction related to controlled substances, the practice of 433 pharmacy, or the dispensing of medicinal drugs. 434 (16)âEXEMPTIONS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR CERTAIN 435 ESTABLISHMENTS.âAn establishment that stores, warehouses, or 436 holds noncontrolled prescription drugs solely for the purpose of 437 arranging for their destruction is not required to comply with 438 paragraph (1)(c), subsection (3), subsection (4), subsection 439 (5), subsection (6), paragraphs (8)(a), (b), and (d), or 440 subsection (13) with respect to those noncontrolled prescription 441 drugs, but shall maintain records of the locations from which 442 the prescription drugs were collected, a formulary or 443 description of that locationâs prescription drugs, an estimate 444 of the amount of the prescription drugs collected, and the 445 manner, date, and location of destruction of the prescription 446 drugs. 447 (17)âRULEMAKING.âThe department shall adopt rules to 448 implement this section as necessary to protect the public 449 health, safety, and welfare. Such rules must include, but need 450 not be limited to, requirements for the storage and handling of 451 prescription drugs and for the establishment and maintenance of 452 prescription drug distribution records. 453 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.